Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4329.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2025, chapter 34, article 1, section 2, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Total Appropriation $ deleted text begin 58,957,000 deleted text end new text begin 59,306,000 new text end $ deleted text begin 56,052,000 deleted text end new text begin 56,072,000 new text end Appropriations by Fund 2026 2027 General deleted text begin 58,558,000 deleted text end new text begin 58,907,000 new text end deleted text begin 55,653,000 deleted text end new text begin 55,673,000 new text end Remediation 399,000 399,000 The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, unless otherwise specified in this section, the commissioner of agriculture may use up to 7.5 percent of money appropriated for costs incurred to administer the Department of Agriculture's grant and financial assistance programs. Sec. 2. Laws 2025, chapter 34, article 1, section 2, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Protection Services Appropriations by Fund General deleted text begin 20,828,000 deleted text end new text begin 21,177,000 new text end deleted text begin 21,207,000 deleted text end new text begin 21,227,000 new text end Remediation 399,000 399,000 (a) $399,000 the first year and $399,000 the second year are from the remediation fund for administrative funding of the voluntary cleanup program. (b) $639,000 the first year and $639,000 the second year are for the soil health financial assistance program under Minnesota Statutes, section 17.134. The commissioner may award no more than $50,000 of the appropriation each year to a single recipient. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the commissioner may use up to 6.5 percent of this appropriation for costs incurred to administer the program. Any unencumbered balance does not cancel at the end of the first year and is available in the second year. Appropriations encumbered under contract on or before June 30, 2027, for soil health financial assistance grants are available until June 30, 2029. (c) deleted text begin $275,000deleted text end new text begin $485,000new text end the first year and deleted text begin $250,000deleted text end new text begin $270,000new text end the second year are for compensation for livestock destroyed or crippled by a wolf under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.737. The first year appropriation may be spent to compensate for livestock that were destroyed or crippled during fiscal year 2025. If the amount in the first year is insufficient, the amount in the second year is available in the first year. The commissioner may use up to $5,000 each year to reimburse expenses incurred by university extension educators to provide fair market values of destroyed or crippled livestock. If the commissioner receives federal money to pay claims for destroyed or crippled livestock, an equivalent amount of this appropriation may be used to reimburse nonlethal prevention methods performed by federal wildlife services staff. The base for this appropriation is $175,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. (d) deleted text begin $255,000deleted text end new text begin $394,000new text end the first year and $230,000 the second year are for compensation for crop or fence damage caused by elk under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.7371. If the amount in the first year is insufficient, the amount in the second year is available in the first year. The commissioner may use up to $10,000 of the appropriation each year to reimburse expenses incurred by the commissioner or the commissioner's approved agent to investigate and resolve claims, as well as for costs associated with training for approved agents. The commissioner may use up to $40,000 of the appropriation each year for grants to producers for measures to protect stored crops from elk damage. If the commissioner determines that claims made under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.737 or 3.7371, are unusually high, amounts appropriated for either program may be transferred to the appropriation for the other program. The base for this appropriation is $155,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. (e) $825,000 the first year and $825,000 the second year are to replace capital equipment in the Department of Agriculture's analytical laboratory. (f) $750,000 the first year and $750,000 the second year are for additional meat and poultry inspection services. The commissioner is encouraged to seek inspection waivers, match federal money, and offer more online inspections for the purposes of this paragraph. This is a onetime appropriation. (g) $500,000 the first year and $500,000 the second year are for grants to counties to support county agricultural inspectors. The commissioner may use up to three percent of the appropriation each year for administration. This is a onetime appropriation. County agricultural inspectors and county-designated employees must annually submit an application, on a form approved by the commissioner, to be eligible for funding during a given year. The commissioner must equally divide available grant money among eligible counties. To be eligible for grants under this section, a county must employ a county agricultural inspector or a county-designated employee who: (1) has attended training for new county agricultural inspectors offered by the commissioner; (2) coordinates with the commissioner to review applicable laws and enforcement procedures; (3) compiles and submits to the commissioner local weed inspector annual report data; (4) conducts an annual meeting and training for local weed inspectors; and (5) assists the commissioner with control programs and other agricultural programs when requested under Minnesota Statutes, section 18.81, subdivision 1b, as directed by the county board. (h) $250,000 the first year and $250,000 the second year are appropriated to establish and administer the biofertilizer innovation and efficiency program under Minnesota Statutes, section 18C.113. The commissioner may use up to 6.5 percent of this appropriation for costs incurred to administer the program. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, any unencumbered balance at the end of fiscal year 2026 does not cancel and is available until June 30, 2027. This is a onetime appropriation. (j) $75,000 the first year is to conduct an evaluation of the practice performance and economic performance of the Olmsted County groundwater protection and soil health initiative, including the cover crop program, alternative crops program, and haying, grazing, and pasture enhancement program. The evaluation must look at environmental outcomes, include a cost-benefit analysis, and be submitted to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over agriculture policy and finance by June 1, 2027. The commissioner may contract with an independent third party to conduct the evaluation. (k) $420,000 the first year and $924,000 the second year are to support current services. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end